California, session 20252026, AB345.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3075.2 is added to the Labor Code, to read:3075.2. (a) (1) Within 30 days of receiving an application for a new apprenticeship program, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall confirm the completeness of the application, and notify applicants if any components of the application are incomplete.(2) This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit the Division of Apprenticeship Standards from requesting additional information as necessary throughout the review process.(b) (1) If the chief, in consultation with the Interagency Advisory Committee on Apprenticeships, has not made a final determination on a completed application for a new apprenticeship program within six months of receiving the completed application, the program shall have conditional approval if it satisfies all of the following: (A) The program has been approved by the United States Department of Labor.(B) The program has documented employer commitments that demonstrate both of the following:(i) A capacity to employ apprentices.(ii) The ability to provide on-the-job training.(C) The program has an identified local educational agency partner to ensure the theoretical instruction component of the apprenticeship meets educational standards.(2) A program that has conditional approval to operate shall be subject to specific reasonable conditions the Division of Apprenticeship Standards deems necessary and appropriate.(c) The chief shall make a final determination on an application within one year of receiving the completed application.(d) For purposes of this section, “conditional approval” means the temporary authorization to operate an apprenticeship program, pending final review.(e) This section shall not apply to apprenticeship programs in the building and construction trades and firefighter programs.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.